Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-32,160
Hazardous operation; violations; uniform standards and criteria; remedies not exclusive.

The director may set uniform standards and criteria for early warning that the continued operation of any health maintenance organization might be hazardous to its enrollees or creditors or the general public and standards for evaluating the financial condition of any health maintenance organization, which standards shall be consistent with the purposes expressed in section 44-32,159. The remedies and measures available to the director under such section shall be in addition to, and not in lieu of, the remedies and measures available to the director under the Nebraska Insurers Supervision, Rehabilitation, and Liquidation Act.

Laws 1990, LB 1136, § 69.

Nebraska Insurers Supervision, Rehabilitation, and Liquidation Act, see section 44-4862.